Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.010

Legislative intent.

It is the legislative intent to provide for the incorporation of an individual or group of individuals to render the same professional service to the public for which such individuals are required by law to be licensed or to obtain other legal authorization.

[ 1969 c 122 s 1.]